Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.110

Proof of service by publication.

Proof of service, in case of publication, shall be the affidavit of the publisher, printer, foreperson, or principal clerk, showing the same.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3008; Code 1881 s 1721; 1873 p 338 s 28; RRS s 1767.]